District of Columbia statutes.
10-302.03

Priority for Department programs and facilities.

(a)

The Department shall give preference to residents for enrollment and participation slots in sports leagues, teams, games, programs, and camps managed or sponsored by the Department for youth, adults, and seniors, before offering participation slots to non-residents.

(b)

Within 180 days of April 23, 2013, the Department shall develop a plan to actively advertise and promote the activities listed in subsection (a) of this section to residents to encourage their participation.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 3c
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-280, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2124
D.C. Law 19-280 added this section.